Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 14.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201083-969
Punishment inflicted; exclude view of persons; exception.

When any convicted person is sentenced to death, such punishment shall be inflicted at
a Department of Correctional Services facility under the supervision
of the Director of Correctional Services and
in such a manner as to exclude the view of all persons except those
permitted to be present as provided in sections 83-970 and 83-971.

Laws 1973, LB 268, § 18;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 29-2533;

Laws 2009, LB36, § 14.